Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6180.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 406. (1) The legislative body may charge reasonable fees for zoning permits as a condition of granting authority to use, erect, alter, or locate dwellings, buildings, and structures, including tents and recreational vehicles, within a zoning district established under this act. (2) A zoning ordinance adopted by a city may provide that a person is not eligible to apply for a rezoning, site plan approval, special land use approval, planned unit development approval, variance, or other zoning authorization if the person is delinquent in paying a civil fine, costs, or a justice system assessment imposed by an administrative hearings bureau established in that city pursuant to under section 4q of the home rule city act, 1909 PA 279, MCL 117.4q. (3) A zoning ordinance provision adopted under subsection (2) does not apply to an applicant for a zoning authorization if the applicant became the owner of the property by foreclosure or by taking a deed in lieu of foreclosure and is 1 of the following: (a) A government-sponsored enterprise. As used in this subdivision, "government-sponsored enterprise" means that term as defined in 2 USC 622(8), or the Michigan state housing development authority created under the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1401 to 125.1499c. (b) A financial institution. As used in this subdivision, "financial institution" means that term as defined in section 4(c) of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2004. (c) A For 6 months after the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, a mortgage servicer , as that term is defined in section 1a of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651a, that is subject to the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1651 to 445.1684. (d) Beginning on the effective date of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, a mortgage servicer, as that term is defined in section 5 of the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act, that is subject to the residential mortgage licensing and supervision act. (e) (d) A credit union service organization that is organized under the laws of this state or the United States. (4) Subsection (2) does not apply to a zoning authorization if the authorization will correct, in whole or in part, the blight violation that was the subject of the delinquent payment referred to in subsection (2). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6177 (request no. H05171'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.